Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 9.2 Qualified Dispositions in Trust

18-9.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Qualified Dispositions in Trust Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1.

18-9.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Claim” means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal equitable, secured or unsecured.

“Creditor” means, with respect to a transferor, a person who has claim.

“Debt” means liability on a claim.

“Disposition” means a transfer, conveyance or assignment of property (including a change in the legal ownership of property occurring upon the substitution of one trustee for another or the addition of one or more new trustees), or the exercise of a power so as to cause a transfer of property, to a trustee or trustees, but shall not include the release or relinquishment of an interest that theretofore was the subject of a qualified disposition.

“Property” includes real property, personal property, and interests in real or personal property.

“Qualified disposition” means a disposition by or from a transferor to a trustee, with or without consideration, by means of a trust instrument.

“Spouse” and “former spouse” means only persons to whom the transferor was married at, or before the time the qualified disposition is made.

“Transferor” means a natural person who, or entity which, as an owner of property or as a holder of a general power of appointment, which authorizes the holder to appoint in favor of the holder, the holder’s creditors, the holder’s estate or the creditors of the holder’s estate, or as a trustee, directly or indirectly, makes a disposition or causes a disposition to be made.

“Qualified trustee ” means a person who:

In the case of natural person, is a resident of this state other than the transferor, or, in all other cases, is authorized by the provisions of the general or public laws to act as a trustee, and whose activities are subject to supervision by the department of business regulation, The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency, or the Office of Thrift Supervision, or any successor to them; and

Maintains or arranges for custody in this state of some or all of the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition, maintains records for the trust on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, prepares or arranges for the preparation of fiduciary income tax returns for the trust, or otherwise materially participates in the administration of the trust.

For the purposes of this chapter, neither the transferor nor any other natural person who is a nonresident of this state nor an entity that is not authorized by the law of this state to act as a trustee or whose activities are not subject to supervision as provided in subparagraph (I) of this subsection shall be considered a qualified trustee; however, nothing in this chapter shall preclude a transferor from appointing one or more advisors, including, but not limited to:

Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to remove and appoint qualified trustees or trust advisors; and

Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to direct, consent to or disapprove distributions from the trust. For purposes of this section, the term “advisor” includes a trust “protector” or any other person who, in addition to a qualified trustee, holds one or more trust powers.

A person may serve as an advisor, notwithstanding that such person is the transferor of the qualified disposition, but such a person may not otherwise serve as advisor of a trust that is a qualified disposition except with respect to the retention of the veto right permitted by subsection (10)(ii) of this section.

In the event that a qualified trustee of a trust ceases to meet the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this subsection, and there remains no trustee that meets such requirements, such qualified trustee shall be deemed to have resigned as of the time of such cessation, and thereupon the successor qualified trustee provided for in the trust instrument shall become a qualified trustee of the trust, or in the absence of any successor qualified trustee provided for in the trust amendment, the superior court shall, upon application of any interested party, appoint a successor qualified trustee.

In the case of a disposition to more than one trustee, a disposition that is otherwise a qualified disposition shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because not all of the trustees are qualified trustees.

“Trust instrument” means an instrument appointing a qualified trustee or qualified trustees for the property that is the subject of a disposition, which instrument:

Expressly incorporates the general or public laws of this state to govern the validity, construction, and administration of the trust;

Is irrevocable; provided, that a trust instrument shall not be deemed revocable due to its inclusion in one or more of the following:

A transferor’s power to veto a distribution from the trust;

A power of appointment (other than a power to appoint to the transferor, the transferor’s creditors, the transferor’s estate or the creditors of the transferor’s estate) exercisable by will or other written instrument of the transferor effective only upon the transferor’s death;

The transferor’s potential or actual receipt of income, including rights to such income retained in the trust instrument;

The transferor’s potential or actual receipt of income or principal from a charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust as such terms are defined in § 664 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 664] and any successor provision thereto; and the transferor’s right, at any time and from time to time by written instrument delivered to the trustee, to release such transferor’s retained interest in such a trust, in whole or in part, in favor of a charitable organization that has or charitable organizations that have a succeeding beneficial interest in such trust;

The transferor’s receipt each year of a percentage (not to exceed five percent (5%)) specified in the trust instrument of the initial value of the trust assets on their value determined from time to time pursuant to the trust instrument or of a fixed amount that on an annual basis does not exceed five percent (5%) of the initial value of the trust assets;

The transferor’s potential or actual receipt or use of principal if such potential or actual receipt or use of principal would be the result of a qualified trustee’s or qualified trustees’ acting:

In such qualified trustee’s or qualified trustees’ discretion;

Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the transferor a substantially unfettered right to the receipt or use of the principal; or

At the direction of an adviser described in subsection (9)(iii) of this section who is acting:

In such advisor’s discretion; or

Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the transferor a substantially unfettered right to the receipt of or use of principal. For purposes of this subsection, a qualified trustee is presumed to have discretion with respect to the distribution of principal unless such discretion is expressly denied to such trustee by the terms of the trust instrument;

(G)

The transferor’s right to remove a trustee or advisor and to appoint a new trustee or advisor (other than a person who is a related or subordinate party with respect to the transferor within the meaning of § 672(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 672(c)] and any successor provision thereto);

(H)

The transferor’s potential or actual use of real property held under a qualified personal residence trust within the meaning of such term as described in § 2702(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 2702(c)] and any successor provision thereto or the transferor’s possession and enjoyment of a qualified annuity interest within the meaning of such term as described in Treasury Regulation § 25.2702-5(c)(8) [26 C.F.R. § 25.2502-5(c)(8)] and any successor provision thereto;

The transferor’s potential or actual receipt of income or principal to pay, in whole or in part, income taxes due on income of the trust if such potential or actual receipt of income or principal is pursuant to a provision in the trust instrument that expressly provides for the payment of such taxes and if such potential or actual receipt of income or principal would be the result of a qualified trustee’s or qualified trustees’ acting:

In such qualified trustee’s or qualified trustees’ discretion; or

At the direction of an advisor described in subsection (9)(iii) of this section who is acting in such advisor’s discretion. Distributions to pay income taxes made under discretion included in a governing instrument pursuant to subparagraph (C), subparagraph (F) or this subparagraph (I) of subsection (10)(ii) of this section may be made by direct payment to the taxing authorities.

(iii)

Provides that the interest of the transferor or other beneficiary in the trust property or the income therefrom may not be transferred, assigned, pledged or mortgaged, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, before the qualified trustee or qualified trustees actually distribute the property or income therefrom to the beneficiary, and such provision of the trust instrument shall be deemed to be a restriction on the transfer of the transferor’s beneficial interest in the trust that is enforceable under applicable nonbankruptcy law within the meaning of § 541(c)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. § 541(c)(2)) or any successor provision thereto; and

(iv)

A disposition by a trustee that is not a qualified trustee to a trustee that is a qualified trustee shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because the trust instrument fails to meet the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 478, § 1.

18-9.2-3.
No retained interest of transferor.

A qualified disposition shall be subject to §

18-9.2-4

of this chapter notwithstanding a transferor’s retention of any or all of the powers and rights described in subdivision

18-9.2-2(10)(ii)

and the transferor’s service as investment advisor pursuant to subdivision

18-9.2-2(9)(iv)

. The transferor shall have only such powers and rights as are conferred by the trust instrument. Except as permitted by subdivisions

18-9.2-2(9)(iv)

and

18-9.2-2(10)(ii)

, a transferor shall have no rights or authority with respect to the property that is the subject of a qualified disposition or the income therefrom, and any agreement or understanding purporting to grant or permit the retention of any greater rights or authority shall be void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 478, § 1.

18-9.2-4.
Avoidance of qualified dispositions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, no action of any kind, including, without limitation, an action to enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law or in equity for an attachment or other provisional remedy against property that is the subject of a qualified disposition or for avoidance of a qualified disposition, unless the action is brought pursuant to the provisions of §

6-16-7

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

6-16-9

, a creditor may not bring an action under subsection (a) of this section if:

The creditor’s claim against the transferor arose before the qualified disposition was made, unless the action is brought within four (4) years after the qualified disposition is made or, if later, within one year after the qualified disposition was or could reasonably have been discovered by the creditor; or

The creditor’s claim against the transferor arose subsequent to the qualified disposition, unless the action is brought within four (4) years after the qualified disposition is made.

In any action described in subsection (a) of this section, the burden to prove the matter by clear and convincing evidence shall be upon the creditor.

For purposes of this chapter, a qualified disposition that is made by means of a disposition by a transferor who is a trustee shall be deemed to have been made as of the time the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition was originally transferred to the transferor (or any predecessor trustee) making the qualified disposition in a form that meets the requirements of subdivisions

18-9.2-2(10)(ii)

and (iii). If a trustee of an existing trust proposes to make a qualified disposition pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (c) of this section but the trust would not conform to the requirements of subparagraph

18-9.2-2(10)(ii)

(B) as a result of the original transferor’s nonconforming powers of appointment, then, upon the trustee’s delivery to the qualified trustee of an irrevocable written election to have this subsection apply to the trust, the nonconforming powers of appointment shall be deemed modified to the extent necessary to conform with subparagraph

18-9.2-2(10)(ii)(B)

. For purposes of this chapter, the irrevocable written election shall include a description of the original transferor’s powers of appointment as modified together with the original transferor’s written consent thereto, but no such consent of the original transferor shall be considered a disposition within the meaning of subsection

18-9.2-2(4)

.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a creditor, including a creditor whose claim arose before or after a qualified disposition, or any other person shall have only such rights with respect to a qualified disposition as are provided in this section and §§

18-9.2-5

and

18-9.2-6

, and no such creditor nor any other person shall have any claim or cause of action against the trustee, or advisor described in subdivision

18-9.2-2(9)(iii)

, of a trust that is the subject of a qualified disposition, or against any person involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution or funding of a trust that is the subject of a qualified disposition.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no action of any kind, including, without limitation, an action to enforce a judgment by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law or in equity against the trustee, or advisor described in subdivision

18-9.2-2(9)(iii)

, of a trust that is the subject of the qualified disposition, or against any person involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution or funding of a trust that is the subject of a qualified disposition, if, as of the date such action is brought, an action by a creditor with respect to such qualified disposition would be barred under this section.

In circumstances where more than one qualified disposition is made by means of the same trust instrument, then:

The making of a subsequent qualified disposition shall be disregarded in determining whether a creditor’s claim with respect to a prior qualified disposition is extinguished as provided in subsection (b) of this section; and

Any distribution to a beneficiary shall be deemed to have been made from the latest such qualified disposition.

If, in any action brought against a trustee of a trust that is the result of a qualified disposition, a court takes any action whereby such court declines to apply the law of this state in determining the validity, construction or administration of such trust, or the effect of a spendthrift provision thereof, such trustee shall immediately upon such court’s action and without the further order of any court, cease in all respects to be a trustee of such trust and a successor trustee shall thereupon succeed as trustee in accordance with the terms of the trust instrument or, if the trust instrument does not provide for a successor trustee and the trust would otherwise be without a trustee, the Superior Court, upon the application of any beneficiary of such trust, shall appoint a successor trustee upon such terms and conditions as it determines to be consistent with the purposes of such trust and this statute. Upon such trustee’s ceasing to be trustee, such trustee shall have no power or authority other than to convey the trust property to the successor trustee named in the trust instrument or appointment by the Superior Court in accordance with this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 478, § 1.

18-9.2-5.
Persons not subject to qualified dispositions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

18-9.2-4

, this chapter shall not apply to defeat a claim brought by:

Any person to whom the transferor is indebted on or before the date of a qualified disposition on account of an agreement or order of court for the payment of support or alimony in favor of the transferor’s spouse, former spouse or children, or for a division or distribution of property in favor of the transferor’s spouse or former spouse, but only to the extent of the debt; or

To any person who suffers death, personal injury, or property damage on or before the date of a qualified disposition by a transferor, which death, personal injury, or property damage is at any time determined to have been caused in whole or in part by the tortuous act or omission of either the transferor or by another person for whom the transferor is or was vicariously liable but only to the extent of such claim against such transferor or other person for whom such transferor is or was vicariously liable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 100.

18-9.2-6.
Effect of avoidance of qualified dispositions.

A qualified disposition shall be avoided only to the extent necessary to satisfy the transferor’s debt to the creditor at whose instance the disposition had been avoided, together with any costs, including attorney’s fees, that the court may allow.

In the event any qualified disposition is avoided as provided in subsection (a) of this section, then:

If the court is satisfied that the trustee has not acted in bad faith in accepting or administering the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition:

Such trustee shall have a first and paramount lien against the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition in an amount equal to the entire cost, including attorney’s fees, properly incurred by the trustee in the defense of the action or proceedings to avoid the qualified disposition;

The qualified disposition shall be avoided subject to the proper fees, costs, preexisting rights, claims and interest of the trustee (and of any predecessor trustee that has not acted in bad faith); and

For purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the trustee did not act in bad faith merely by accepting the property;

If the court is satisfied that a beneficiary of a trust has not acted in bad faith, the avoidance of the qualified disposition shall be subject to the right of the beneficiary to retain any distribution made upon the exercise of a trust power or discretion vested in the trustee of the trust, which power or discretion was properly exercised prior to the creditor’s commencement of an action to avoid the qualified disposition. For purposes of this subdivision, it shall be presumed that the beneficiary, including a beneficiary who is also a transferor of the trust, did not act in bad faith merely by creating the trust or by accepting a distribution made in accordance with the terms of the trust.

A creditor shall have the burden of proving that a trustee or beneficiary acted in bad faith as required under subsection (b) of this section by clear and convincing evidence except that, in the case of a beneficiary who is also the transferor, the burden on the creditor shall be to prove that the transferor-beneficiary acted in bad faith by a preponderance of the evidence. The preceding sentence provides substantive nonprocedural rights under Rhode Island law.

For purposes of this chapter, attachment, garnishment, sequestration, or other legal or equitable process shall be permitted only in those circumstances permitted by the express terms of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 478, § 1.

18-9.2-7.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter applies to qualified dispositions made on or after July 1, 1999.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 402, § 1.